District of Columbia statutes.
42-3507.02

Eligibility assistance.

Each housing provider commencing substantial rehabilitation, demolition, or housing discontinuance, on or after July 17, 1985, shall pay relocation assistance in an amount calculated under § 42-3507.03 to all tenants of the housing accommodation who:

(1)

Were living in the rental units contained in the housing accommodation from which they are being displaced at the time the notice required by § 42-3505.01 is given; and

(2)

Are displaced from rental units because the housing accommodation in which they are located is to be substantially rehabilitated, demolished, or discontinued.

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 702, 32 DCR 3089
1981 Ed., § 45-2572.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3507.01.